Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 25 Pari-Mutuel Wagering

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 1, provides: “(a) Notwithstanding W.S.

6-7-102

, skill based amusement games operating in the state prior to the effective date of this section shall be allowed to continue operation until June 30, 2021 in accordance with the requirements of this section.

“(b) Any skill based amusement game that does not meet the requirements of this section shall be removed from the state by the operator.

“(c) Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this section a skill based amusement game that meets the requirements of this section shall be approved by the commission to continue operating in the state or it shall be removed from the state by the operator.

“(d) Each operator shall provide for a nationally recognized, independent gaming laboratory approved by the commission to directly submit to the commission a general functional evaluation laboratory report regarding the software installed on each skill based amusement game indicating whether the skill based amusement game is in compliance with this section. Any skill based amusement game that does not meet the requirements of this section as indicated by the laboratory report shall immediately be removed from the state by the operator.

“(e) Skill based amusement games that meet the requirements of this section shall bear a commission issued decal that identifies the operator of the game. No skill based amusement game shall be operational unless it bears a commission issued decal. The commission shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a decal. Each decal shall include the bucking horse and rider emblem. Fees collected shall be deposited to the commission gaming account, which is hereby created. For the period from the effective date of this section through June 30, 2021, funds within the account are continuously appropriated to the commission to pay for reasonable expenses incurred to administer this section.

“(f) No skill based amusement game shall allow a game play of more than three dollars ($3.00) per play.

“(g) No skill based amusement game shall allow a payout of more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per play.

“(h) No establishment shall have more than four (4) skill based amusement games at any one (1) time. Only an establishment that had a skill based amusement game operating within the establishment as of the effective date of this section may continue to have a skill based amusement game operating pursuant to this section.

“(j) An establishment shall not locate a skill based amusement game in an area of the establishment into which a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years may enter. An establishment shall conspicuously mark each area of the establishment with a skill based amusement game as an ‘age restricted area.’ The establishment shall not allow a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to play a skill based amusement game.

“(k) An establishment shall pay the commission a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) to continue to have skill based amusement games in the establishment until June 30, 2021. Operators of skill based amusement games shall pay the commission a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) to operate skill based amusement games until June 30, 2021. Fees paid pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the commission gaming account.

“(m) Taxes shall be calculated and paid on a weekly basis based on the net proceeds earned during the prior week on skill based amusement games. On a weekly basis, an operator shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during the prior week on the operator's skill based amusement games. The commission shall deposit these monies to the commission gaming account. The commission shall report on amounts received under this subsection to the joint appropriations committee quarterly. Once the commission gaming account reaches one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), on a weekly basis, an operator shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during the prior week on the operator's skill based amusement games and of the twenty percent (20%), the commission shall remit these monies to the state treasurer for distribution as follows:

“(i) Forty-five percent (45%) to the county and the city or town in which the skill based amusement game is located, in equal shares, or to the county alone if the skill based amusement game is not located within the boundaries of a city or town;

“(ii) Forty-five percent (45%) to the school foundation program account;

“(iii) Ten percent (10%) to the commission gaming account.

“(n) The commission may promulgate any necessary rules to implement and administer this section.

“(o) This section shall not apply to pari-mutuel wagering on events that have previously occurred.

“(p) As used in this section:

“(i) ‘Commission’ means the commission created under W.S.

11-25-101

;

“(ii) ‘Establishment’ means a single physical place of business;

“(iii) ‘Net proceeds’ means all revenue less payments to the player;

“(iv) ‘Operator’ means a person that possesses and operates skill based amusement games for profit;

“(v) ‘Skill based amusement game’ means a game played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player, determined by an individual's level of strategy and skill, rather than any inherent element of chance, is the primary factor in determining the outcome and for which the player may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a successful outcome.

“(q) Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

“(r) This section is repealed effective July 1, 2021.”

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “(a) The Wyoming pari-mutuel commission is continued as the Wyoming gaming commission, as provided in this act. All positions, personnel, appropriations, property and equipment of the Wyoming pari-mutuel commission shall be under control of the Wyoming gaming commission, as created by this act. The validity of rules, regulations, orders, contracts, agreements or other obligations of the Wyoming pari-mutuel commission shall not be affected by this act.

“(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, members of the Wyoming pari-mutuel commission shall continue their current terms as members of the Wyoming gaming commission.

“(c) The appointment of the newly created eighth and ninth members to the Wyoming gaming commission may be made under this act on or after the effective date of this section.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or death of participant in automobile or horse race at public track, 13 ALR4th 623.

Judicial review of administrative ruling affecting conduct or outcome of publicly regulated horse, dog or motor vehicle race, 36 ALR4th 1169.

Validity, construction and application of statute or ordinance prohibiting or regulating use of messenger services to place wagers in pari-mutuel pool, 78 ALR4th 483.